Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2403, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 482, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 2403), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2403. A. No person shall be eligible to participate in
the Oklahoma Rising Scholars Award Program unless the person:
1. Has complied with all of the rules promulgated by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education pursuant to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Rising Scholars Award Act, Section 2401
et seq. of this title, for the award, regulation, and administration
of scholarships; and
2. Qualifies as one of the following:
a. an Individual Applicant Qualified Student, which shall
mean a student who is a resident of the State of

Oklahoma whose American College Testing Program score
or whose Scholastic Aptitude Test score falls within
the 99.5 to 100.0 percentile levels as administered in
the State of Oklahoma and whose grade point average
and/or class rank is exceptional, as determined by the
State Regents,
b. a Presidential Scholar, which shall mean a student
selected by the Commission on Presidential Scholars
administered by the United States Department of
Education,
c. a National Merit Scholar, which shall mean a student
designated as a National Merit Scholar by the National
Merit Scholarship Corporation,
d. a National Merit Finalist, which shall mean a student
designated as a National Merit Finalist by the
National Merit Scholarship Corporation, or
e. after October 1, 1999, an Institutional Nominee, which
shall mean a student nominated by an institution in
The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education:
(1) whose American College Testing Program or
Scholastic Aptitude Test score falls within the
95.0 to 99.49 percentile levels, or
(2) who shows exceptional academic achievement as
evidenced by factors, including, but not limited
to, grade point average, class rank, national
awards, scholastic achievements, honors, and who
shows exceptional promise based on documentation
that may include, but not be limited to, teacher
recommendations, extracurricular activities, and
evidence of overcoming economic and social
obstacles as determined by the State Regents.
The State Regents shall ensure that standards of
high academic ability are documented.
Scholarship awards to Institutional Nominees
shall become effective when appropriate
documentation is verified by the State Regents.
B. No person shall be eligible to receive a scholarship
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Rising Scholars Award
ENR. H. B. NO. 3710 Page 2

Program unless the person is enrolled as a full-time student at a
public or private accredited institution of higher education in
Oklahoma.
C. For a student who qualifies pursuant to subparagraphs a
through d of paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section and subject
to the availability of funds, the Oklahoma Rising Scholars Award
Program shall provide a scholarship in an amount not to exceed the
costs of all enrollment fees, tuition and other fees, room and
board, and all required textbooks or materials for up to five (5)
years of undergraduate and/or graduate study at an accredited public
or private institution of higher education in Oklahoma. The State
Regents may establish separate scholarship award levels for each
qualifying category.
1. If the student is attending an institution within The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, the total funding for the
scholarship provided in this subsection, exclusive of any
internships, shall not exceed the costs for items specified in this
subsection at the institution attended as determined annually by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
2. If the student is attending a private institution of higher
education, the total funding for the scholarship provided in this
subsection, exclusive of any internships, shall not exceed the costs
for items specified in this subsection at an institution of The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education of comparable type which
has the highest general enrollment fees of its type of institution
in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education as determined
annually by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
D. For a student who qualifies pursuant to subparagraph e of
paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section and subject to the
availability of funds, the Oklahoma Rising Scholars Award Program
shall provide a scholarship in an amount not to exceed the average
costs of all enrollment fees and other fees, room and board, and all
required textbooks or materials for up to five (5) years of
undergraduate and/or graduate study at an accredited public or
private institution of higher education in Oklahoma. The State
Regents may establish separate scholarship award levels for each
qualifying category.
1. If the student is attending an institution within The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, the institution shall
provide a tuition waiver not to exceed the average cost of tuition.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3710 Page 3

The total funding for the scholarship and waiver provided for
students attending an institution within The Oklahoma State System
of Higher Education as provided in this subsection, exclusive of any
internships, shall not exceed the costs for items specified in this
subsection at the institution attended as determined annually by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
2. If the student is attending a private institution of higher
education in Oklahoma, the scholarship shall include an amount not
to exceed the average cost of tuition. The total funding for
scholarships for students attending a private institution as
provided in this subsection, exclusive of any internships, shall not
exceed the costs for items specified in this subsection at an
institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education of
comparable type which has the highest general enrollment fees of its
type of institution in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education
as determined annually by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education.
E. If a person identifies himself or herself as a student with
a disability and requests consideration for a scholarship under the
Oklahoma Rising Scholars Award Program by means other than standard
testing procedures, the State Regents shall determine what means of
assessment are appropriate and upon the basis of said assessment
results, determine what level of award, if any, shall be made.
F. The State Regents may establish cohort‑based award schedules
for the Oklahoma Rising Scholars Award Program. The cohort-based
award schedule amount and structure of scholarship funding
applicable to a recipient may vary by the academic year in which the
recipient is first awarded under the Oklahoma Rising Scholars Award
Act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3710 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 23rd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3710 Page 5